Alabama, session 2026rs, HB492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) CANDY. Food products that list sugar, cane sugar,
corn syrup, or high fructose corn syrup as a primary
ingredient. The term includes any confectionery products
primarily composed of sugar or sweeteners and intended for
consumption as candy, including, but not limited to, chocolate
bars, non-chocolate candy, chewing gum, and similar products.
The term does not include any baked goods, prepared desserts,
bakery items, baking mixes, cooking ingredients, dessert
toppings, frostings, jellies, jams, marshmallows, hot cocoa
mix, powdered drink mixes, or other foods intended primarily
for cooking, baking, or meal preparation.
(2) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Human
Resources.
(3) ENERGY DRINK. A beverage containing at least 65
milligrams of caffeine per eight fluid ounces which is
advertised as being specifically designed to provide metabolic
stimulation or an increase to the consumer's mental or
Page 2

stimulation or an increase to the consumer's mental or
HB492 INTRODUCED
physical energy. The term does not include coffee or tea or
any substantially coffee or tea-based beverage.
(4) PREPARED DESSERT. A processed, shelf-stable,
ready-to-eat, pre-packaged sweet food intended for immediate
consumption without any further preparation. The term includes
foods mostly made out of chemically modified substances
extracted from foods, along with additives to enhance taste,
texture, appearance, and durability, with minimal whole foods.
(5) SNAP BENEFIT. A financial benefit, coupon, or
privilege available under the federal Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program, 7 U.S.C. Chapter 51.
(6) SODA. Beverages that list, as the first two
ingredients, any combination of: (i) carbonated water; and
(ii) sugar, cane sugar, corn syrup, or high fructose corn
syrup. The term does not include any beverages that contain
low or non-caloric sweeteners.
(7) USDA FOOD AND NUTRITION SERVICE. The United States
Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition Service.
(b) The commissioner of the department shall request a
waiver from the USDA Food and Nutrition Service to authorize
the department to exclude candy, soda, prepared desserts, and
energy drinks from the definition of "eligible foods" under 7
C.F.R. § 271.2.
(c)(1) If the waiver described in subsection (b) is
approved by the USDA Food and Nutrition Service, the
department shall prohibit the use of SNAP benefits for the
purchase of candy, soda, prepared desserts, and energy drinks
provided that retailers must be provided at least one month's
Page 3

provided that retailers must be provided at least one month's
HB492 INTRODUCED
notice before the waiver may become effective. The Department
of Revenue, in consultation with the department, shall provide
notice of the effective date of the waiver to SNAP-authorized
retailers.
(2) The Department of Revenue shall coordinate with
SNAP-authorized retailers to implement the approved waiver.
The Alabama Department of Revenue shall work directly with
retailers to:
a. Identify items included and excluded under the
waiver; and
b. Provide guidance on SNAP-eligible and
SNAP-ineligible purchases. The guidance shall include, but not
be limited to, product identification on existing universal
product codes or other standard point-of-sale identifiers used
by retailers.
100 (3) The Department of Revenue shall offer technical
101 assistance, training, and any other necessary resources to
102 support retailers in compliance with the waiver and minimize
103 disruption to retail operations.
104 (d) If the waiver described in subsection (b) is
105 denied, the commissioner shall resubmit the request for a
106 waiver to the USDA Food and Nutrition Service annually until
107 approval is granted.
108 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
109 1, 2026.
Page 4